Wyoming, session 2025, SF0193.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-3-116(a)(intro), (d)(i) and by
creating a new subsection (e) is amended to read:

37-3-116. Electric utility service agreements.

(a) An electric utility may, subject to subsection
(e) of this section, enter into a service agreement as
specified in subsection (d) of this section, provided that
the terms and conditions of the agreement:
SF0193

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0744

(d) This section shall only apply to service
agreements:

(i) Between an electric utility and a customer
with projected electric usage greater than five (5)
megawatts. Subsection (e) of this section shall apply to a
customer with projected electric usage greater than one
hundred (100) megawatts;

(e) An electric utility shall enter into a service
agreement under subsection (a) of this section if:

(i) A customer request for a new service on or
after July 1, 2025 has a projected electric usage greater
than one hundred (100) megawatts;

(ii) An existing customer request for additional
service on or after July 1, 2025 has a projected
incremental electric usage greater than one hundred (100)
megawatts.

SF0193

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0744
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0193